src-fst-affixes-verbs.lexc.md
# Verb inflection and derivation

The verbs' conjugation includes voice (in Finnish grammars also verbal 
genus),  tense/mood (tempus/modus), personal endings and negation marker
The verbs also have productive derivations to defective nouns as
infinitives, and to adjectives as participles, which are considered to be 
part of inflection and thus included in most versions 
([VISK § 105](http://scripta.kotus.fi/visk/sisalto.php?p?105)).
The morphology of participles and historical 4th infinitive is further
detailed in section Deverbal nouns'  morphology.
The analysis strings of verb are not as systematic as nouns,
as many categories collapse together in forms, e.g. the tense and mood
are only distinct with indicative past and non-past, otherwise mood implies
tense in semantic sense.



## Verb stem variation
Verbs have no allomorphic variation per se, except for some assimilation
and variation of ð forms, but the stem variation is the same
as in nouns. The examples for verb stems are given for each class:
A infinitive's lative, e infinitive's inessive, indicative present 1st 
singular, indicative present 3rd singular, indicative past 1st singular, 
indicative past 3rd singular, conditional past 3rd singular, 
imperative 2nd plural, potential 1st singular, present passive, 
past passive, nut participle passive

### Verb stems without stem variation

The u stems have no stem variation:

*Verbs 52u examples:*
* *kaunistua:* `kaunistua+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # beautify)
* *kaunistuessa:* `kaunistua+V+Act+InfE+Sg+Ine`
* *kaunistun:* `kaunistua+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1`
* *kaunistuu:* `kaunistua+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3`
* *kaunistuin:* `kaunistua+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1`
* *kaunistui:* `kaunistua+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3`
* *kaunistuisi:* `kaunistua+V+Act+Cond+Sg3`
* *kaunistukaa:* `kaunistua+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2`
* *kaunistunen:* `kaunistua+V+Act+Pot+Sg1`
* *kaunistutaan:* `kaunistua+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pe4`
* *kaunistuttiin:* `kaunistua+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pe4`
* *kaunistuttu:* `kaunistua+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom`
* *kaunistuminen:* `kaunistua+V+Der/minen+Sg+Nom`

The o stems have no stem variation:

*Verbs 52o examples:*
* *punoa:* `punoa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # bundle?)
* *punoessa:* `punoa+V+Act+InfE+Sg+Ine`
* *punon:* `punoa+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1`
* *punoo:* `punoa+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3`
* *punoin:* `punoa+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1`
* *punoi:* `punoa+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3`
* *punoisi:* `punoa+V+Act+Cond+Sg3`
* *punokaa:* `punoa+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2`
* *punonen:* `punoa+V+Act+Pot+Sg1`
* *punotaan:* `punoa+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pe4`
* *punottiin:* `punoa+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pe4`
* *punottu:* `punoa+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom`
* *punominen:* `punoa+V+Der/minen+Sg+Nom`

The ö stems have no stem variation:

*Verbs 52ö examples:*
* *säilöä:* `säilöä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # store)
* *säilöessä:* `säilöä+V+Act+InfE+Sg+Ine`
* *säilön:* `säilöä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1`
* *säilöö:* `säilöä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3`
* *säilöin:* `säilöä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1`
* *säilöi:* `säilöä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3`
* *säilöisi:* `säilöä+V+Act+Cond+Sg3`
* *säilökää:* `säilöä+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2`
* *säilönen:* `säilöä+V+Act+Pot+Sg1`
* *säilötään:* `säilöä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pe4`
* *säilöttiin:* `säilöä+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pe4`
* *säilötty:* `säilöä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom`
* *säilöminen:* `säilöä+V+Der/minen+Sg+Nom`

The y stems have no stem variation:

*Verbs 52y examples:*
* *ällistyä:* `ällistyä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # amaze)
* *ällistyessä:* `ällistyä+V+Act+InfE+Sg+Ine`
* *ällistyn:* `ällistyä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1`
* *ällistyy:* `ällistyä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3`
* *ällistyin:* `ällistyä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1`
* *ällistyi:* `ällistyä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3`
* *ällistyisi:* `ällistyä+V+Act+Cond+Sg3`
* *ällistykää:* `ällistyä+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2`
* *ällistynen:* `ällistyä+V+Act+Pot+Sg1`
* *ällistytään:* `ällistyä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pe4`
* *ällistyttiin:* `ällistyä+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pe4`
* *ällistytty:* `ällistyä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom`

### Verb stems with only gradation


*Verbs 52 k~0 o examples:*
* *haukkoa:* `haukkoa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # gasp)


*Verbs 52 k~0 u examples:*
* *nuokkua:* `nuokkua+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # sleep)


*Verbs 52 k~0 y examples:*
* *kärkkyä:* `kärkkyä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # steal a base)


*Verbs 52 p~0 o examples:*
* *harppoa:* `harppoa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # walk)


*Verbs 52 p~0 u examples:*
* *loppua:* `loppua+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # end)


*Verbs 52 p~0 y examples:*
* *leppyä:* `leppyä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # settle)


*Verbs 52 t~0 y examples:*
* *kivettyä:* `kivettyä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # stone)


*Verbs 52 t~0 o examples:*
* *viittoa:* `viittoa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # sign)


*Verbs 52 t~0 u examples:*
* *hermottua:* `hermottua+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # nerve)


*Verbs 52 k~0’ y examples:*
* *mäikyä:* `mäikyä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # bong)


*Verbs 52 k~0’ o examples:*
* *takoa:* `takoa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # hammer)


*Verbs 52 k~0’ u examples:*
* *maukua:* `maukua+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # gong)


*Verbs 52 p~v y examples:*
* *elpyä:* `elpyä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # rescuscitate)


*Verbs 52 p~v u examples:*
* *hiipua:* `hiipua+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # fizzle)


*Verbs 52 p~v o examples:*
* *silpoa:* `silpoa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # slash)


*Verbs 52 t~d o examples:*
* *kietoa:* `kietoa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # entangle)


*Verbs 52 t~d y examples:*
* *siliytyä:* `siliytyä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # iron)


*Verbs 52 t~d u examples:*
* *rohtua:* `rohtua+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # scar)


*Verbs 52 k~g u examples:*
* *vinkua:* `vinkua+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # squeal)


*Verbs 52 k~g o examples:*
* *penkoa:* `penkoa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # dig)


*Verbs 52 p~m o examples:*
* *tempoa:* `tempoa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # tuck)


*Verbs 52 p~m u examples:*
* *ampua:* `ampua+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # shoot)


*Verbs 52 t~l y examples:*
* *mieltyä:* `mieltyä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # like)


*Verbs 52 t~l u examples:*
* *humaltua:* `humaltua+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # intoxicate)


*Verbs 52 t~n u examples:*
* *vakaantua:* `vakaantua+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # stabilise)


*Verbs 52 t~n y examples:*
* *tyhjentyä:* `tyhjentyä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # empty)


*Verbs 52 t~r y examples:*
* *pyörtyä:* `pyörtyä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # faint)


*Verbs 52 t~r o examples:*
* *vartoa:* `vartoa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # wait)


*Verbs 52 t~r u examples:*
* *pusertua:* `pusertua+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # squeeze)

### Verbs with -a stems



*Verbs 53 back examples:*
* *mutristaa:* `mutristaa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # ?)


*Verbs 53 front examples:*
* *kivistää:* `kivistää+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # hurt)


*Verbs 53 front t~0 examples:*
* *räpsyttää:* `räpsyttää+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # blink)


*Verbs 53 back t~0 examples:*
* *vieroittaa:* `vieroittaa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat`



*Verbs 53 back k~0 examples:*
* *purkaa:* `purkaa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # tear)


*Verbs 53 front t~d examples:*
* *kärähtää:* `kärähtää+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # fry)


*Verbs 53 back t~d examples:*
* *mojahtaa:* `mojahtaa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # smack)


*Verbs 53 front t~n examples:*
* *kyntää:* `kyntää+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # plow)


*Verbs 53 back t~r examples:*
* *sortaa:* `sortaa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # crush)

Some of the a stems have t:s in past stems by ti>si variation.


*Verbs 54 back examples:*
* *huutaa:* `huutaa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # yell)


*Verbs 54 front examples:*
* *pyytää:* `pyytää+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # aks)


*Verbs 54 back t~l examples:*
* *sivaltaa:* `sivaltaa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # slash)


*Verbs 54 front t~l examples:*
* *viheltää:* `viheltää+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # whistle)


*Verbs 54 front t~n examples:*
* *hiventää:* `hiventää+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat`


*Verbs 54 back t~n examples:*
* *huonontaa:* `huonontaa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # worsen)


*Verbs 54 back t~r examples:*
* *kuhertaa:* `kuhertaa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # snuggle)


*Verbs 54 front t~r examples:*
* *näpertää:* `näpertää+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # twiddle)

In some cases t:s variation is optionally alongside the regular gradation:



*Verbs 55 front examples:*
* *kiitää:* `kiitää+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # rush)


*Verbs 55 back examples:*
* *joutaa:* `joutaa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat`


*Verbs 55 front t~l examples:*
* *yltää:* `yltää+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # reach)


*Verbs 55 front t~n examples:*
* *entää:* `entää+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat`

Other a stems undergo a:o variation


*Verbs 56 back examples:*
* *kasvaa:* `kasvaa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # grow)


*Verbs 56 back k~0 examples:*
* *jakaa:* `jakaa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # share)


*Verbs 56 back p~0 examples:*
* *tappaa:* `tappaa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # kill)


*Verbs 56 back t~0 examples:*
* *auttaa:* `auttaa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # help)


*Verbs 56 back t~d examples:*
* *sataa:* `sataa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # rain)


*Verbs 56 back t~n examples:*
* *kantaa:* `kantaa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # carry)

In some of the a:o variations the t:s variant is also possible.


*Verbs 57 back examples:*
* *kaataa:* `kaataa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # pour)


*Verbs 57 back t~r examples:*
* *saartaa:* `saartaa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # surround)

### Verbs with e stems


*Verbs 58 front examples:*
* *kytkeä:* `kytkeä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # switch)


*Verbs 58 back examples:*
* *sotkea:* `sotkea+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # mess)


*Verbs 58 back k~0 examples:*
* *pukea:* `pukea+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # dress)


*Verbs 58 front p~v examples:*
* *rypeä:* `rypeä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # bathe)


*Verbs 58 front t~d examples:*
* *päteä:* `päteä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # nitpick)


*Verbs 58 back t~d examples:*
* *kutea:* `kutea+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # breed)


*Verbs 58 back k~g examples:*
* *tunkea:* `tunkea+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # push)


*Verbs 58 back k~j examples:*
* *polkea:* `polkea+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # stomp)


*Verbs 58 front k~j examples:*
* *särkeä:* `särkeä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # break)

Some of the e stems allow for optional t:s variation in past form.


*Verbs 59 examples:*
* *tuntea:* `tuntea+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # feel)

The rare ht:ks kind of variation is also possible.


*Verbs 60 examples:*
* *lähteä:* `lähteä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # go)

### Verbs with i stems


*Verbs 61 back examples:*
* *kosia:* `kosia+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # propose)


*Verbs 61 front examples:*
* *ryskiä:* `ryskiä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # crash)


*Verbs 61 back k~0 examples:*
* *kukkia:* `kukkia+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # bloom)


*Verbs 61 front k~0 examples:*
* *sörkkiä:* `sörkkiä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # meddle)


*Verbs 61 back p~0 examples:*
* *kalppia:* `kalppia+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat`


*Verbs 61 front p~0 examples:*
* *hyppiä:* `hyppiä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # jump)


*Verbs 61 back t~0 examples:*
* *moittia:* `moittia+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat`


*Verbs 61 front t~0 examples:*
* *miettiä:* `miettiä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # ponder)


*Verbs 61 front p~v examples:*
* *riipiä:* `riipiä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # pull)


*Verbs 61 back p~v examples:*
* *raapia:* `raapia+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # scratch)


*Verbs 61 back t~d examples:*
* *ahnehtia:* `ahnehtia+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # greed)


*Verbs 61 front t~d examples:*
* *ehtiä:* `ehtiä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat`


*Verbs 61 front k~g examples:*
* *mönkiä:* `mönkiä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # crawl)


*Verbs 61 back k~g examples:*
* *onkia:* `onkia+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # fish)


*Verbs 61 frontp~m examples:*
* *tympiä:* `tympiä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # bore)


*Verbs 61 back t~n examples:*
* *kontia:* `kontia+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # mole)


*Verbs 61 back k~j examples:*
* *hylkiä:* `hylkiä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # reject)

### Verbs with long vowel stem
These verbs also have da variant of a infinitive forms.


*Verbs 62 back examples:*
* *kopioida:* `kopioida+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # copy)


*Verbs 62 front examples:*
* *öykkäröidä:* `öykkäröidä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # bully)


*Verbs 63 a examples:*
* *saada:* `saada+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # get)


*Verbs 63 y examples:*
* *myydä:* `myydä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # sell)
